District of Columbia statutes.
29-604.06

Partner’s rights and duties with respect to information.

(a)

A partnership shall keep its books and records, if any, at its principal office.

(b)

A partnership shall provide partners and their agents and attorneys access to its books and records. It shall provide former partners and their agents and attorneys access to books and records pertaining to the period during which they were partners. The right of access provides the opportunity to inspect and copy books and records during ordinary business hours. A partnership may impose a reasonable charge, covering the costs of labor and material, for copies of documents furnished.

(c)

Each partner and the partnership shall furnish to a partner, and to the legal representative of a deceased partner or partner under legal disability:

(1)

Without demand, any information concerning the partnership’s business [activities] and affairs reasonably required for the proper exercise of the partner’s rights and duties under the partnership agreement or this chapter; and

(2)

On demand, any other information concerning the partnership’s business [activities] and affairs, except to the extent the demand or the information demanded is unreasonable or otherwise improper under the circumstances.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, §§ 2(f)(4)(C), (D), 59 DCR 13171
This section is referenced in § 29-605.05.
1981 Ed., § 41-154.3.
2001 Ed., § 33-104.03.
2001 Ed., § 29-604.03.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 redesignated former § 20-604.03 as § 29-604.06; and apparently intended to substitute “activities” for “business” twice in (c).

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 403 of the Uniform Partnership Act (1997 Act).

Section 2(f)(4)(C) of D.C. Law 19-210 redesignated former § 20-604.06 as § 29-604.09.

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.